Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.195.050

Private school advisory committee.

The superintendent of public instruction is hereby directed to appoint a private school advisory committee that is broadly representative of educators, legislators, and various private school groups in the state of Washington.

[ 1984 c 40 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.02.250.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 40: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 40 s 17.]